Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7858.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18 of the General Laws entitled "Accident and Sickness Insurance
Policies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18-96. Disability income insurance coverage for state employees -- Age
nondiscrimination.
(a) Any insurer, health maintenance organization, or other entity authorized to issue
disability income insurance or short-term disability insurance in this state that submits a bid,
proposal, or contract to provide short-term disability insurance coverage to employees of the State
of Rhode Island shall offer such coverage on a nondiscriminatory basis with respect to age.
(b) Coverage offered pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be made available to
all eligible state employees actively employed by the state, regardless of age, including employees
seventy (70) years of age or older.
(c) No policy, contract, certificate, rider, or plan document issued pursuant to this section
shall:
(1) Exclude an otherwise eligible employee solely on the basis of age;
(2) Terminate coverage solely due to the attainment of a specified age; or
(3) Impose different eligibility standards based solely on age.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require coverage for an employee who is
not otherwise actively employed or eligible under the terms of employment established by the state.
(e) The provisions of this section shall apply only to disability income or short-term

disability insurance policies issued or renewed pursuant to a bid, contract, or agreement with the
State of Rhode Island.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC005396
========
LC005396 - Page 2 of 3